Washington statutes.
RCW 43.31.506

Child care facility fund committee—Authority to award moneys from fund.

The child care facility fund committee is authorized to solicit applications for and award grants and loans from the child care facility fund to assist persons, businesses, or organizations to start a licensed child care facility, or to make capital improvements in an existing licensed child care facility. Grants and loans shall be awarded on a one-time only basis, and shall not be awarded to cover operating expenses beyond the first three months of business. No grant shall exceed twenty-five thousand dollars. No loan shall exceed one hundred thousand dollars.

[ 1991 c 248 s 2; 1989 c 430 s 5.]

NOTES:

Legislative findings—Severability—1989 c 430: See notes following RCW 43.31.502.